Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.36.083

Hate crime offense—Civil action.

In addition to the criminal penalty provided in RCW 9A.36.080 for committing a hate crime offense, the victim may bring a civil cause of action for the hate crime offense against the person who committed the offense. A person may be liable to the victim of the hate crime offense for actual damages, punitive damages of up to one hundred thousand dollars, and reasonable attorneys' fees and costs incurred in bringing the action.

[ 2019 c 271 s 3; 1993 c 127 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1993 c 127: See note following RCW 9A.36.078.